Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-210 Plan of operation.

(a)(1) The association shall submit to the commissioner
a plan of operation and any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure
the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the association. The
plan of operation and any amendments thereto shall become effective upon the
commissioner's written approval or if the commissioner has not disapproved it
within thirty days.

(2) If the association fails to submit a suitable
plan of operation within one hundred twenty days following July 1, 1988, or if
at any time thereafter the association fails to submit suitable amendments to
the plan, the commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, adopt and
promulgate such reasonable rules as are necessary or advisable to effectuate
the provisions of this part. Such rules shall continue in force until modified
by the commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by the association and
approved by the commissioner.

(b) All member insurers shall comply with the
plan of operation.

(c) The plan of
operation shall, in addition to requirements enumerated elsewhere in this part:

(1) Establish procedures for handling the assets of
the association;

(2) Establish the amount and method of reimbursing
members of the board of directors under section 431:16-207(c);

(3) Establish regular places and times for meetings
including telephone conference calls of the board of directors;

(4) Establish procedures for records to be kept of
all financial transactions of the association, its agents, and the board of
directors;

(5) Establish the procedures whereby selections for
the board of directors will be made and submitted to the commissioner;

(6) Establish any additional procedures for
assessments under section 431:16-209;

(7) Contain additional provisions necessary or proper
for the execution of the powers and duties of the association;

(8) Establish procedures to remove a director for
cause, including the case in which a director is affiliated with a member
insurer that becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer; and

(9) Require the board of directors to establish a
policy and procedure for addressing conflicts of interests.

(d) The plan of
operation may provide that any or all powers and duties of the association,
except those under sections 431:16-208(k)(3) and 431:16-209, are delegated to a corporation, association, or other organization
which performs or will perform functions similar to those of this association,
or its equivalent, in two or more states. The corporation, association, or
organization shall be reimbursed for any payments made on behalf of the
association and shall be paid for its performance of any function of the
association. A delegation under this subsection shall take effect only with
the approval of both the board of directors and the commissioner, and may be
made only to a corporation, association, or organization which extends
protection not substantially less favorable and effective than that provided by
this part. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 250, §9]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any proceedings in
which a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1,
2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Revision Note

"July 1, 1988," substituted for "the effective
date of this part".

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next